Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.110

Rule-making authority.

The director may adopt and enforce rules to carry out provisions related to vehicle registrations, certificates of title, and drivers' licenses. These rules must not be based:

(1) Solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose;

(2) On the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency; or

(3) On any combination of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 2010 c 161 s 202; 1995 c 403 s 108; 1979 c 158 s 120; 1965 c 156 s 11; 1961 c 12 s 46.08.140. Prior: 1937 c 188 s 79; RRS s 6312-79. Formerly RCW 46.08.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.